Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4616.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. So far as its validity in law is concerned, marriage is a civil contract between a man and a woman, 2 parties, to which the consent of parties capable in law of contracting is essential. Consent alone is not enough to effectuate a legal marriage on and after January 1, 1957. Consent shall must be followed by obtaining a license as required by section 1 of Act No. 128 of the Public Acts of 1887, being section 551.101 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1887 PA 128, MCL 551.101, or as provided for by section 1 of Act No. 180 of the Public Acts of 1897, being section 551.201 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1897 PA 180, MCL 551.201, and solemnization as authorized by sections 7 to 18. of this chapter. Sec. 3. A man shall not marry his mother, sister, grandmother, daughter, granddaughter, stepmother, grandfather's wife, son's wife, grandson's wife, wife's mother, wife's grandmother, wife's daughter, wife's granddaughter, brother's daughter, sister's daughter, father's sister, mother's sister, or cousin of the first degree, or another man.An individual shall not marry the individual's parent, sibling, grandparent, child, grandchild, stepparent, grandparent's spouse, child's spouse, grandchild's spouse, spouse's parent, spouse's grandparent, spouse's child, spouse's grandchild, sibling's child, parent's sibling, or cousin of the first degree. Sec. 9. In the solemnization of marriage, no particular form shall be is required, except that the parties shall must solemnly declare, in the presence of the person solemnizing the marriage and the attending witnesses, that they take each other as husband and wife; spouses; and in every case, there shall must be at least 2 witnesses, besides the person solemnizing the marriage, present at the ceremony. Enacting section 1. Sections 1 and 4 of 1846 RS 83, MCL 551.1 and 551.4, are repealed. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.